Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.030

Current authorization required to offer or grant degree—Penalty for violation.

(1) A degree-granting institution shall not operate and shall not grant or offer to grant any degree unless the institution has obtained current authorization from the council.

(2) Any person, group, or entity or any owner, officer, agent, or employee of such entity who willfully violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate violation. The criminal sanctions may be imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction in an action brought by the attorney general of this state.

[ 2012 c 229 s 544; 2003 c 53 s 175; 1986 c 136 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.